California statutes. Public Utilities Code
This article does not authorize the construction of any sanitary sewer within the territorial limits of any other municipality if the method of disposition of sewage therefrom is by discharging it in the Pacific Ocean within one mile of the territorial limits of the other municipality or in any manner that may create a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10107.

Nothing in this article limits in any respect the jurisdiction, powers, and duties vested by law in the Public Utilities Commission or, with respect to state highways, in the Department of Transportation. In the event of any conflict of jurisdiction, that of the Public Utilities Commission or the Department of Transportation, as the case may be, shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rights in Public Lands and Waters [10151. - 10155.]

10151.

There is granted to every municipal corporation of the State the right of way for the location, construction, and maintenance of water works and works for the generation and distribution of electrical power, and for every necessary adjunct thereto, over any swamp, overflowed, or other public lands of the State not otherwise disposed of or in use, not in any case exceeding in length or width that which is necessary for the construction of the works or adjuncts, or for the protection thereof, and not in any case exceeding 100 feet in width along each side of the marginal limits of the works or adjuncts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10152.

There is granted to every municipal corporation of the State the right to take from any of the lands belonging to the State adjacent to the works of such corporation, all materials, such as wood, stone, and earth, naturally appurtenant thereto, which are necessary and convenient for the original construction of the works and adjuncts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10153.

There is granted to every municipal corporation of the State the right to take, in the manner provided by law, any waters belonging to the State, not otherwise disposed of, flowing or existing in any stream or lake intersected, crossed, or tapped by its water works, so far as is necessary to give such municipality and its inhabitants an ample supply of water for all municipal, domestic, irrigation, and manufacturing purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10154.

If the route or location of any works or adjuncts is changed so as not to cover or cross the lands selected under this article, or the use of the land selected is abandoned, the selected lands revert, and the title thereto is reinvested in the State or its grantees free from all such uses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10155.

When any selection of a right of way or land is made under this article by any municipal corporation, the legislative body thereof shall transmit to the State Lands Commission, State Controller, and recorder of the county in which the selected lands are situated, a verified plat of the lands selected, giving the extent thereof and the uses for which the lands are claimed or desired. If approved, the State Lands Commission shall so endorse the plat and issue to the corporation a permit to use the right of way and lands, unless on petition properly presented to a court of competent jurisdiction a review is had and such use prohibited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Permitted Use of Improvements [10201. - 10213.]

10201.

This article is intended to provide a means of making the work and improvements herein mentioned useful and beneficial to the lands or property assessed to pay the costs and expenses of the construction thereof. The powers herein granted are supplemental to any other powers granted by law to any county or city, and this article does not repeal any other powers to use or utilize such work or improvements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.

When any legislative body elects to proceed under this article, the provisions hereof only shall apply and the limitations herein shall be followed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10203.

This article and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed to the end that the purposes hereof may be effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.

“District,” as used in this article, includes any district for which the legislative body of any county or city may make contracts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10205.

Whenever, under any street improvement act under which public work or improvements may be installed or constructed and the costs and expenses assessed in whole or in part against the lands or property benefited, there have been installed or constructed within any city or within the unincorporated territory of any county any wells, pumps, dams, reservoirs, storage tanks, channels, tunnels, conduits, pipes, hydrants, meters, or other appurtenances for supplying or distributing a domestic water supply, or all or any combinations thereof, and whenever there have been installed or constructed within any city or within the unincorporated territory of any county any mains, services, pipes, fittings, valves, regulators, governors, meters, drips, drains, tanks, ditches, tunnels, conduits, channels, or other appurtenances for supplying or distributing a domestic or industrial gas supply, or all or any combinations thereof, and no provision has been made for the maintenance, operation, and use of the work or improvement constructed, and the city owns no plant or system which can conveniently furnish water or gas, or the county owns no plant or system which can conveniently furnish the water or gas, the legislative body of the city or county, as the case may be, may grant permission to furnish water or gas therefor to any district, public corporation, mutual company, public utility company, private company, or individual.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

Before granting such permission the legislative body of the county or city shall find that the public interest, convenience, and necessity require that the work or improvement be used, that water or gas is necessary therefor, and that a certain, named, district, public corporation, mutual company, public utility company, private corporation, or individual can most conveniently furnish water or gas. Thereupon the county or city may grant to such district, public corporation, mutual company, public utility company, private corporation, or individual the right to attach his lines or system to the work or improvement, and to furnish water or gas through the work or improvement to all lands which were assessed to pay the costs and expenses of constructing the work or improvement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.

The permission shall be signed by the mayor or other chief executive of the city or by the chairman of the board of supervisors of a county, and by the person or authorized officers of the permittee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.

The permission shall state the time for which it is given, which shall not exceed two years, and describe the work or improvement for which it is given, and shall require the permittee to maintain the work or improvement during the term of the permission, and to make all necessary repairs thereto during such term, and to furnish gas or water, as the case may be, to all lands assessed to pay all or any part of the costs and expenses of the work or improvement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

If any extensions of or additional installations for the work or improvement are necessary in order to serve all of the lands required to be served, the permittee shall not be obligated to make such extensions or additional installations, but shall permit any owner of such land to make the extensions and installations under reasonable regulations to be fixed by the city engineer or county surveyor, to attach them to the work or improvement, and to receive gas or water therefrom.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.

The permission shall provide that the charge made by the permittee for gas or water shall not be greater than the charge therefor made by the permittee for such service elsewhere, and shall provide that the permittee shall pay a reasonable charge, to be determined by the legislative body granting the permission, for the use of the work or improvement. Such rental shall be paid to the treasurer of the county or city at least semiannually and placed in a special fund, which shall be used for the improvement or replacement of the work or improvement or any part thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10211.

The permission granted under this article to a private corporation or individual, not a public utility, and the furnishing of gas or water thereunder shall not be construed as a holding out or undertaking of such corporation or individual to serve any and all persons or as constituting the corporation or individual a public utility or as being any evidence thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10212.

The permission shall expressly reserve to the legislative body granting it the right to terminate it whenever the city or county can conveniently furnish gas or water. If so terminated, the county or city shall thereafter furnish such gas or water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10213.

The permission shall provide that if any district or public corporation is formed or extended, and if the district or public corporation can conveniently serve the territory with gas or water, any permission granted to any public utility, private corporation, or individual may be terminated by the legislative body. If permission is so terminated, the legislative body may grant permission to use the work or improvement and furnish gas or water to such district or public corporation in the manner and under the limitations provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Injury to Property [10251. - 10251.]

10251.

Any person who injures or destroys, through want of proper care, any necessary or useful facility or equipment of any municipal corporation is liable to the municipal corporation for all damages sustained thereby. The measure of damages to the facility or equipment injured or destroyed shall be the cost to repair or replace the property injured or destroyed including direct and allocated costs for labor, materials, supervision, supplies, tools, taxes, transportation, administrative and general expense and other indirect or overhead expenses, less credit, if any, for salvage. The specifying of the measure of damages for the facility or equipment shall not preclude the recovery of such other damages occasioned thereby as may be authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 617.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Financing Provisions [10301. - 10303.]

10301.

The Legislature finds and declares that financing the acquisition of privately owned facilities of an electrical or gas corporation by a municipal corporation not previously engaged in furnishing electricity or gas to customers on a regular and ongoing basis or by a redevelopment agency should be subject to the investigation and safeguards provided by this article in the public interest. The Legislature further finds and declares that the purpose of this article is to ensure that the power to acquire and operate these facilities is exercised in the wisest manner consistent with its grant and in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.

As used in this article:

(a) “Electrical corporation” means an electrical corporation as defined in Section 218.

(b) “Gas corporation” means a gas corporation as defined in Section 222.

(c) “Redevelopment agency” means a redevelopment agency as defined in Section 34102 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10303.

The use of certificates of participation by a municipal corporation not previously engaged in furnishing electricity or gas to customers on a regular and ongoing basis, or the use of any evidence of indebtedness, including, but not limited to, certificates of participation, by a redevelopment agency, for the acquisition of all, or any portion, of the facilities of an electrical or gas corporation for the purpose of furnishing electricity or gas to customers is subject to an election held pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, except that, in the case of any acquisition by a redevelopment agency, the term “qualified voters,” as used in Section 54380 of the Government Code, means those persons who would be served by the facilities proposed to be acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT ACT [11501. - 14403.5.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [11501. - 11536.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [11501. - 11509.]

11501.

This division may be cited as the “Municipal Utility District Act.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

“District” means a municipal utility district formed under this division or under Chapter 218 of the Statutes of 1921, as originally enacted or subsequently amended; “special district” means a special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes created under this division or under Chapter 218 of the Statutes of 1921, as originally enacted or subsequently amended; and “board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

“Public agency” includes a city, county water district, county sanitation district, or sanitary district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11505.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11506.

“Sewage disposal” means the acquisition, construction, enlargement, operation, and maintenance of intercepting sewers, sewage treatment works, pumping plants, outfall sewers, and appurtenances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11507.

“Percent of the total vote cast,” when used with reference to the requirements of any petition or nomination paper, means percent of the total vote cast, exclusive of vote by mail ballots, within the proposed district, district, proposed special district, special district, or territory proposed to be annexed to a district, as the case may be at the last statewide general
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 118, Sec. 4.   (AB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11508.

“Solid Waste Resource Recovery” means the acquisition, construction, enlargement, operation, and maintenance of facilities for the purpose of collecting, reducing, separating, recovering, converting, and recycling solid waste, and for the purpose of disposing of solid waste residues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

11509.

“Electricity district” means a municipal utility district formed under this division that furnishes electricity to more than 100,000 customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1396, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [11531. - 11536.]

11531.

A municipal utility district may be created as provided in this division and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11532.

All persons who, at the time this division goes into effect, hold offices under Chapter 218 of the Statutes of 1921, as originally enacted or subsequently amended, continue to hold them according to their former tenure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11533.

Except as otherwise provided in this division elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws of the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11534.

Except as otherwise provided in this division all ordinances, summaries of ordinances, and notices that are required to be published shall be published once a week for two successive weeks (two publications) in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11535.

Whenever in this division publication in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district is required, and there is no such newspaper, then the publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation published in any county where the district is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11536.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the Retirement Board or of any officer or employee of the Retirement System is authorized or required under the provisions of this division, except in the single instance provided in Section 13244, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimiles of such signatures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Formation of Districts [11561. - 11701.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11561. - 11562.]

11561.

Any public agency together with unincorporated territory, or two or more public agencies, with or without unincorporated territory, may organize and incorporate as a municipal utility district. Public agencies and unincorporated territory included within a district may be in the same or separate counties and need not be contiguous. No public agency shall be divided in the formation of a district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11562.

A request for the formation of a district may be made by resolution or by petition as set out in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Request by Resolution [11581. - 11583.]

11581.

Legislative bodies of half or more of the public agencies proposed to be included in the proposed district may pass resolutions declaring that in their opinion public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of a municipal utility district to be known as the “(giving the name) municipal utility district.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11582.

The resolutions may state the kind of utility proposed to be first acquired, but failure to acquire such utility shall not affect the validity of the district. They shall describe the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, except that if it is intended to organize the district of public agencies only, a statement of the names of such public agencies is a sufficient and legal description of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11583.

Certified copies of the resolutions shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the county containing the largest number of voters within the proposed district, requesting that board of supervisors to call an election without delay for determining whether the district will be created.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Request by Petition [11611. - 11614.]

11611.

Instead of resolutions, a petition may be presented to the board of supervisors of the county containing the largest number of voters within the proposed district, signed by voters within the proposed district equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total vote cast.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11612.

The petition shall contain substantially the same declarations and statements required to be contained in the resolutions presented to a board of supervisors under this chapter, and declare that, in the opinion of the petitioners, public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of a municipal utility district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11613.

The petition may be on separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated it certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11614.

The clerk of the board of supervisors of the county in which the petition is presented shall compare the signatures to the petition with the affidavits of registration and certify to their sufficiency or insufficiency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [11641. - 11656.]

11641.

Upon receipt of certified copies of the resolutions or of a sufficient petition, the board of supervisors to whom they are presented shall call an election within the proposed district without delay, to be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days after the date of the order calling the election, for the purpose of determining whether the proposed district will be created and established, and for the purpose of electing the first board of directors therefor in case the district is created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

11642.

Before calling the election the board of supervisors shall divide the proposed district into five wards, the boundaries of which shall be so drawn that each shall contain approximately an equal number of voters, as nearly as may be. The public agencies and any other territory included in the proposed district may be divided for the purpose of establishing ward boundaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11643.

Upon establishing the wards, the board of supervisors shall publish notice of the election within the proposed district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11643.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer,
 within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

11643.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

11643.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual
 voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

11643.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition
 prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The election officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 180.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11644.

The notice shall state the name of the proposed district, and describe the boundaries thereof and the boundaries of the wards provided for the purpose of electing directors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11645.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following:Shall the “ (giving name thereof) municipal utility district” be created and established?YESNO

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11646.

The ballots shall also contain the names of the persons nominated in each ward to serve as a member of the board from such ward, showing separately each ward and its nominees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11647.

Any person may be nominated for the office of director upon written petition of at least 50 voters of the ward in which such person resides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11648.

Candidates for the office of director shall be voted upon at large, and every voter in the proposed district may vote for all of the directors to be elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11649.

No person shall be entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the territory included in the proposed district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11650.

The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election, and be consolidated therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11651.

The board of supervisors which called the election shall meet on Monday next succeeding the day of the election and canvass the votes cast thereat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11652.

(a) The board of supervisors shall canvass, separately, the returns of each public agency and each parcel of unincorporated territory, if any.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), the board of supervisors shall declare a district created and established of those public agencies and parcels of unincorporated territory in which a majority of those persons who voted did so in favor of the creation of the district. Those
 public agencies and parcels of unincorporated territory in which a majority of those persons voting did not vote in favor of the creation of the district shall be excluded from the district.

(c) A district may be created and established pursuant to subdivision (b) only if the number of registered voters in the approving public agencies and parcels of unincorporated territory is two-thirds or more of the total number of registered voters within the district as proposed to the voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11653.

No person may serve as a director unless he is a resident and voter of the district as finally determined. Any vacancies on the board caused by the elimination of territory shall be filled by appointment by the remaining directors, in which case ward lines may be disregarded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11654.

The board of supervisors shall also canvass the returns of the election with respect to the persons voted for as directors, and shall declare the persons receiving the highest number of votes, for each ward, respectively, to be duly elected as directors of the district, if they are residents and voters thereof as finally determined.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11655.

The board of supervisors calling the election shall make all provision for the holding thereof throughout the entire district as proposed, and shall pay the cost thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11656.

If a special election is held exclusively on the proposition of organizing a district, the expenditure therefor shall be reimbursed to the county which called the election by means of a tax on all the taxable property within the public agencies and unincorporated territory which was proposed to be included in the district, and this tax shall be added to the next county tax bills by the proper officials of the counties involved, respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Establishment of the District [11681. - 11681.]

11681.

The board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the result of the election to be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State, from and after which the establishment of the district shall be deemed complete.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contest of Incorporation [11701. - 11701.]

11701.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of any district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of incorporation is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of filing the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State, otherwise the incorporation and the legal existence of the district shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of Districts [11801. - 11950.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [11801. - 11801.]

11801.

The government of every district is vested in a board of five directors, one from each ward, together with the other officers mentioned in this division. The directors shall be residents and voters of the respective wards from which they are nominated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election of Directors [11821. - 11832.]

11821.

The first directors are elected at the formation election as provided in Chapter 2. All elections of directors subsequent to the first shall be held at the same time as the general election in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11822.

Notice of election shall be published and no other notice of such election need be given.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11823.

The board shall by resolution or ordinance fix the boundaries of the wards for the purpose of electing directors therefrom. The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any wards pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11824.

The notice of election shall refer to the wards established by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11825.

Not more than 113 days prior to the election, upon request, the county elections official of the principal county containing the majority of the population of the ward from which the candidate is seeking election shall issue nomination papers and all other forms required for nomination to the office of director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11827.

Nomination papers may be circulated throughout the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11828.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the provisions of the Elections Code prescribed for independent nominations shall substantially govern the manner of appointment of circulators, the form of nomination papers and other forms, the securing of signatures, the filing of the candidate’s declaration of candidacy, and all other things necessary to get the name of the candidate upon the ballot. At the time of issuance of nomination papers, the county elections official shall cause to be entered on the first page of each section of the nomination papers the name of the candidate and the office for which he or she is a candidate. The county elections official shall imprint a stamp on the first page of each section of the nomination papers which reads “Official Filing Form,” and shall affix his or her signature. The county elections official shall keep a list containing the name and address of each candidate, the office for which he or she is a candidate, and the date on which the nomination papers were issued, which list shall be a public record.

(b) Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of any candidate at any time not more than 113 days nor less than 88 days prior to the election. Each section of the nomination papers shall bear the name of a county and only qualified voters of that county shall sign the section. Nomination papers shall be signed either by 1 percent or by 10 of the registered voters from within the district, whichever is the lesser number, but in no event by more than 20 registered voters from within the district. Nomination papers shall be filed with the county elections official of the principal county containing the majority of the population of the ward from which the candidate is seeking election not more than 113 nor less than 88 days before the date of the election and shall be examined by the county elections official. If nomination papers for an incumbent director are not filed by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the election, the voters shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the election to nominate candidates other than the incumbent for that office. As soon as possible under the circumstances, the county elections official shall determine the number of valid signatures. If there are less than 10 valid signatures, the county elections official shall notify the candidate of that fact, and shall accept additional valid signatures at any time prior to the close of the period for circulating nomination papers. Each candidate, at least 88 days prior to the election, shall file a sufficient candidate’s declaration of candidacy with the county elections official with whom he or she filed the nomination papers. The county elections official shall certify the names of all candidates at least 76 days prior to the date of the election so that their names may be placed upon the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11829.
